Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB219.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.3 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:* * *(26) A transfer of real estate to a member of the armed forces that is changing duty stations. For the purposes of this clause, the term " member of the armed forces" shall mean an 12345678910111213141516171819202122 individual who will reside in this Commonwealth and be domiciled in a single-family residence transferred under this clause and has provided a copy of the individual's final orders showing that the individual will be stationed in this Commonwealth or a contiguous state.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0219PN0176 - 2 - 123456